Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-385
Residential facilities; application for admission; referral; return of findings.

Upon receipt of an application for admission, the department shall refer the person for whom admission is requested to an agency or person specially qualified in the diagnosis of mental or related conditions for examination and evaluation. Within fourteen days of referral, the agency or person making such examination and evaluation shall return the findings of the examination and evaluation to the department. The findings and evaluation may also include recommendations with respect to the placement of the person for whom admission is requested in a residential facility. The department may require further examination of the person for whom admission is requested.

Laws 1969, c. 816, § 5, p. 3065;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 802.